New York, session 2025-2026, A3164.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 1 of section 1347 of the public health law is 2 amended to read as follows: 3 1. All departments and boards of health and the commissioner or 4 commissioners thereof shall have the power to enforce the provisions of 5 sections thirteen hundred forty-five to thirteen hundred [forty-seven] 6 forty-eight, inclusive, of this [chapter] title. 7 § 2. Section 1348 of the public health law is renumbered section 1349 8 and amended to read as follows: 9 § 1349. Hotel sanitation; application of article. The provisions of 10 sections thirteen hundred forty-five to thirteen hundred forty-seven[, 11 inclusive,] of this [chapter] title, shall not apply to cities having a 12 population of one million inhabitants or over. 13 § 3. The public health law is amended by adding a new section 1348 to 14 read as follows: 15 § 1348. Hotel sanitation; bedbug notification and training. 1. Hotels 16 and motels shall notify employees of the presence of bedbugs on the 17 premises and shall specify which rooms are infested. 18 2. Notification shall be made promptly following the discovery of 19 bedbugs on the premises. 20 3. In concert with the department, hotels and motels shall develop and 21 administer bedbug training that shall be provided to employees who may 22 be exposed to bedbugs as a part of their daily activities. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD06101-01-5 A. 3164 2 1 4. Training shall be administered within a reasonable time after 2 hiring and once again each year thereafter. 3 5. Training shall include bedbug identification, procedures for 4 reporting infestations to pest management and treating infestations, as 5 appropriate. 6 6. Upon discovery of bedbugs, the hotel or motel shall take the room 7 or area out of service, but no items shall be removed until a pest 8 control management company has inspected the area. 9 7. For purposes of this section: 10 a. "Hotel and motel" shall mean establishments distinguished as 11 hotels, motels, bungalow colonies, or any other establishment comparable 12 or equivalent to any of those previously mentioned. The term shall not 13 include those places or facilities not having the general character- 14 istics of a motel or hotel as that term is generally understood and the 15 commissioner shall have the power to exempt from this section a place or 16 facility that is not within the intent of this definition of a motel or 17 hotel. 18 b. "Employee" shall mean any person employed for hire that may be 19 exposed to bedbugs as a part of their daily routine. Sub-contractors and 20 independent contractors who work twenty hours or more per week are 21 deemed "employees" for purposes of this section. 22 § 4. This act shall take effect on the one hundred twentieth day after 23 it shall have become a law. Effective immediately, the addition, amend- 24 ment and/or repeal of any rule or regulation necessary for the implemen- 25 tation of this act on its effective date are authorized to be made and 26 completed on or before such date.